Wyoming statutes. Title 13 Banks, Banking and Finance
Article 3. Consumer Information Required

§ 13-8-301.
When time of maturity guaranteed; when not.

All foreign building and loan associations doing business in this state that guarantee the time of maturity of their contracts, shares and stock certificates shall show upon their contracts, shares or stock certificates and upon their literature and passbooks the following:

The time of maturity of their contracts, shares or stock certificates;

The time in months in which a member may withdraw and the withdrawal value of each savings certificate, savings contract or share of stock at the end of the first eighteen (18) months and each six (6) months thereafter, printed on the face or back of them;

Whether or not they guarantee a maturity in months and days, and if so, the time in months and days.

An association that does not guarantee the time of maturity shall state the approximate time at which shares or savings certificates will mature, based upon the past and present net earnings distributed to the members’ book accounts. Maturity shall be calculated on the number of payments specified in their contracts.

History.

Laws 1927, ch. 103, § 25; R.S. 1931, § 17-125; C.S. 1945, § 36-128; W.S. 1957, § 13-240; Laws 1977, ch. 67, § 1.

§ 13-8-302.
Repayments and withdrawals.

Borrowers may repay their loans and holders of stock or savings certificates may withdraw their accumulated savings under the same conditions and upon the same terms as are provided for domestic savings and loan associations.

Shares may be withdrawn by giving thirty (30) days notice in writing of the intention to withdraw. The withdrawing shareholder shall be paid in cash, check or bank draft the amount of the withdrawal value of the shares, as shown by the last prior distribution of profits, together with all the dues paid thereon since distribution. Upon withdrawal of shares pledged to the association for stock loan, or stock loans, the association shall first deduct therefrom the indebtedness due the association. Withdrawals shall be paid in the order of their filings except as hereinafter provided, and the secretary or other officer discharging such duties shall enter upon each notice the order and date of filing. Except as hereinafter provided, not more than fifty percent (50%) of the receipts of the association in any month shall be applied to the payment of withdrawals and matured shares without the consent of the board of directors. Whenever an application for withdrawal has been on file or the payment of matured shares demanded and either has remained unpaid for six (6) months, all the receipts of the association in any month from dues, loans repaid, and the proceeds of all other investments shall, after the payment of expenses and general indebtedness, be applied toward the payment of withdrawals and matured stock. The board of directors or the banking commissioner may direct that withdrawals be paid upon a ratable and proportionate basis. After filing the notice of withdrawal provided herein the withdrawing member is entitled to the dividends credited to the same class of shares, until the final payment of his shares is made and membership in the association shall remain unimpaired so long as any accumulation remains to his credit. No officer, director, attorney, clerk or agent of an association and no person in any way interested or concerned in the management of its affairs shall discount or directly or indirectly purchase a share of any association, whether filed for withdrawal or not, except by payment therefor of the withdrawal value of the shares as determined herein. The board of directors of any association may retire all classes of free shares by enforcing withdrawals of the shares. The bylaws shall clearly state the manner in which withdrawals may be enforced. The holders of shares to be withdrawn shall be paid the full value of the shares, including, in such case, their proportion of the contingent fund.

History.

Laws 1927, ch. 103, § 23; R.S. 1931, § 17-123; C.S. 1945, § 36-126; W.S. 1957, § 13-238; Laws 1977, ch. 67, § 1; 1992, ch. 46, § 1.